South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5140.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 26-1-100(A) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (A) The maximum fees that may be charged by a notary for a notarial act is: (1) for an acknowledgment, fiveten dollars per signature; (2) for an oath or affirmation without a signature, fiveten dollars per person; (3) for a jurat, fiveten dollars per signature; (4) for a signature witnessing, fiveten dollars per signature; and (5) for a verification of fact, fiveten dollars per certificate. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----